hr-HR: Vrsta nosača mača motorne pile: Velika; Srednja; Mala; Univerzalno; Ostalo
nb: Motorsagsverd-festetype: Stor; Middels; Liten; Universal; Annet
cs: Způsob uchycení vodicí lišty motorové pily: Velké; Střední; Malé; Univerzální; Jiné
ru: Тип крепления шины бензопилы: Широкий; Средний; Узкий; Универсальный; Другой
pl: Typ mocowania prowadnicy piły łańcuchowej: Duży; Średnie; Mały; Uniwersalne; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia lišty reťazovej píly: Veľký; Stredný; Malý; Univerzálny; Iné
de: Befestigungstyp für Kettensägenschwert: Groß; Medium; Klein; Universell; Sonstiges
nl: Type zaagbladbevestiging: Groot; Medium; Klein; Universeel; Overig
en: Chainsaw bar mount type: Large; Medium; Small; Universal; Other
ja: チェーンソーガイドバーのマウントの種類: 大; 中; 小; ユニバーサル; その他
vi: Loại ngàm gắn lam máy cưa: Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Phổ dụng; Khác
el: Τύπος βάσης λάμας αλυσοπρίονου: Μεγάλη; Μεσαία; Μικρή; Universal; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da barra para motosserra: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Universal; Outro
it: Tipo di fissaggio della barra del motosega: Large; Medio; Small; Universale; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งบาร์เลื่อยยนต์: ใหญ่; ปานกลาง; เล็ก; สากล; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Grandininio pjūklo juostos tvirtinimo tipas: Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Universalus; Kita
fi: Moottorisahan laipan kiinnitystyyppi: Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Yleismallinen; Muu
zh-TW: 鏈鋸導板安裝類型: 大型; 中型; 小型; 通用; 其他
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на шината на верижния трион: Голямо; Средно; Малко; Универсално; Друго
zh-CN: 链锯导板安装类型: 大号; 中号; 小号; 通用型; 其他
ko: 체인톱 바 장착 유형: 라지; 중간; 스몰; 범용; 기타
da: Monteringstype for motorsavssværd: Stor; Medium; Lille; Universal; Andet
es: Tipo de montaje de barra para motosierra: Grande; Medio; Pequeño; Universal; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve meča za motorne žage: Velika; Srednja; Majhna; Univerzalno; Druga
sv: Typ av motorsågssvärdsfäste: Stor; Medium; Liten; Universell; Övrigt
hu: Láncfűrész vezetősín rögzítési típusa: Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Általános; Egyéb
tr: Motorlu testere kılavuz bağlantı tipi: Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Evrensel; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de prindere a lamei de drujbă: Mare; Mediu; Mic; Universal; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da barra da motosserra: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Universal; Outro
fr: Type de fixation du guide-chaîne de la tronçonneuse: Grande; Moyen; Petite; Universel; Autre